Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation  with counties and com-
munity mental health programs,  shall conduct a study to determine the funding required for
each community mental health program to provide the services and perform  the functions
required by law  related to individuals with behavioral health disorders in the following age
groups:
(a) Newborns through youth 17 years of age;
(b) Ages 18 through 25; and
(c) Ages 26 and older.
(2) The study must include, but is not limited to, the costs of providing the services  and
performing the functions described in:
(a) ORS 161.315 to 161.351, 161.355 to 161.371, 161.385 to 161.395 and 161.505 to 161.585.
(b) ORS 426.005 to 426.390, 426.510 to 426.680, 426.701 and 426.702.
(c) ORS 430.021, 430.210, 430.230 to 430.236, 430.265 to 430.380,  430.397 to 430.401, 430.405 to
430.565 and 430.610 to 430.880 except ORS 430.630.
(d) ORS 430.627, 430.628, 430.629 and 430.630.
(3) The authority shall compile a report of the  authority’s findings about the costs of
providing the services and performing the functions described in the sections listed in:
(a) Subsection (2)(a), (b) and (d) of this section and make the report available on  the
authority’s website no later than January 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter; and
(b) Subsection (2)(c) of this section and make the report available on the  authority’s
website no later than January 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall contract  with the Oregon Council for
Behavioral Health to convene a group of behavioral health partners to conduct a study to:
(a) Evaluate the provisions in ORS chapters 414 and  430, administrative rules and state
contracts affecting behavioral  health care providers, coordinated care organizations, private
behavioral health care providers and community mental health programs; and
(b) Make recommendations for  revisions to the statutes, administrative rules and con-
tracts.
(2) The study shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-B) Page 1
(a) Identify redundancies, contradictions and outdated language in  the provisions in ORS
chapters 414 and 430 and recommend solutions that address or  resolve those redundancies,
contradictions or outdated language  to increase efficiencies in the publicly funded behavioral
health system to better serve Oregonians;
(b) Define and clarify the roles and responsibilities under ORS chapters 414 and 430  and
related contract expectations and deliverables of all major behavioral  health system partners
that constitute the public behavioral health system, including but not limited  to coordinated
care organizations, community mental health programs, behavioral health organizations,
county governments and the Oregon Health Authority; and
(c) Develop recommendations to ensure a regulatory  framework that is better for the
population of behavioral health care consumers and the publicly funded providers needed to
serve the population, including by:
(A) Maximizing access to behavioral health services;
(B) Creating portability and accountability for the behavioral health workforce;
(C) Promoting behavioral and physical health integration; and
(D) Addressing the differences  between the regulatory structures for privately funded
and publicly funded health systems in this state.
(3) The group conducting the study must include representatives of:
(a) Consumers of behavioral health services;
(b) Coordinated care organizations;
(c) Community mental health programs;
(d) Culturally-specific behavioral health organizations;
(e) Behavioral health advocacy organizations;
(f) County governments;
(g) The Mental Health Regulatory Agency;
(h) Behavioral health care providers that contract with the state or  with local govern-
ments;
(i) Labor organizations that represent the behavioral health workforce;
(j) Hospitals;
(k) The Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of Oregon;
(L) The units of the  Oregon Health Authority responsible for Medicaid, behavioral health
services, quality, compliance and program integrity;
(m) The nine federally recognized tribes in Oregon; and
(n) The Judicial Department.
(4) Consumers of behavioral health services who serve  on the group conducting the study
must be ensured a meaningful opportunity to participate in developing the  group’s recom-
mendations.
(5) Members of the group conducting the study who are not employed by  a state agency,
county government or city government are entitled  to a stipend and reimbursement of travel
or other expenses as provided in ORS 292.495. Stipends shall  be paid in a manner that allows
the stipends to be excluded from income in determining  eligibility for medical assistance, to
the extent practicable under federal law.
(6) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
group in conducting the study and, to the extent permitted by  laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of  the group consider neces-
sary to conduct the study and develop recommendations.
(7) The  council shall work in partnership with two to four members of the group to
conduct a procurement, no later than June 30, 2024, to hire a consultant to  assist the group
in conducting the study.
(8) No later than December 15,  2024, to the greatest extent practicable, the group shall
report the group’s preliminary  recommendations for legislative changes related to subsection
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-B) Page 2
(2)(a) of this section to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to be-
havioral health. The report need not comply with ORS 192.245.
(9) No  later than December 15, 2025, the group shall submit a final report of the group’s
findings and recommendations developed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section,  in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to behavioral health. The recommendations may include proposed legislation.
SECTION 3.  Section 1 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)  The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with counties and community mental
health programs, shall conduct a study to determine the funding required for each community mental
health program to provide  the services and perform the functions required by law related to indi-
viduals with behavioral health disorders in the following age groups:
(a) Newborns through youth 17 years of age;
(b) Ages 18 through 25; and
(c) Ages 26 and older.
(2) The study must include, but  is not limited to, the costs of providing the services and per-
forming the functions described in:
(a) ORS 161.315 to 161.351, 161.355 to 161.371, 161.385 to 161.395 and 161.505 to 161.585.
(b) ORS 426.005 to 426.390, 426.510 to 426.680, 426.701 and 426.702.
(c) ORS 430.021, 430.210, 430.230 to 430.236, 430.265 to 430.380, 430.397 to  430.401, 430.405 to
430.565 and 430.610 to 430.880 except ORS 430.630.
(d) ORS 430.627, 430.628, 430.629 and 430.630.
(3) The authority shall compile [ a report ] reports  of the authority’s  findings about the costs of
providing the services and performing the functions described in [ the sections listed in: ]
[(a) Subsection (2)(a), (b) and (d) of this section and make the  report available on the authority’s
website no later than January 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter; and ]
[(b) Subsection (2)(c) of this section and  make the report available on the authority’s website no
later than January 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter ] subsection (2) of this  section every five
years and make the reports available on the authority’s website .
SECTION 4.
The amendments to section 1 of this 2024 Act by section 3 of this 2024 Act
become operative on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $255,000, which shall be paid to the Oregon Council for Behav-
ioral Health for the hiring of the consultant under section 2  (7) of this 2024 Act and for the
stipends and reimbursement of travel or other expenses under section 2 (5) of this  2024 Act.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $45,000
is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana  tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591,
Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems
Division - Administration,  for payment to the Oregon Council for Behavioral Health for the
hiring of the consultant under section 2 (7) of this 2024 Act and for  the stipends and re-
imbursement of travel or other expenses under section 2 (5) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8.  Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division - Administration, is increased
by $1,116,812, for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-B) Page 3
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems Division - Admin-
istration, is increased by $256,051,  for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (3), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for health  policy and analytics, is increased by $146,921,
for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for health policy and analytics, is increased by
$93,933, for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is in-
creased by $20,356, for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $12,210, for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4092 (HB 4092-B) Page 4